Tennessee statutes. Title 53 Food, Drugs And Cosmetics
Part 3

Tennessee Biological Residue Act of 1972

53-7-301. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Biological Residue Act of 1972.”

Acts 1972, ch. 604, § 1; T.C.A., § 52-935.

53-7-302. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Animal” means any member of the animal kingdom whether domesticated or wild, but not including humans;

“Animal product” means any product derived from any animal or animals that is or could be suitable for human consumption;

“Biological residue” means any substance, including metabolites, remaining in or on any animal prior to or at the time of slaughter, in or on any of its tissues after slaughter, or in or on any animal product as the result of treatment with or exposure of the animal or animal product to any pesticide, organic or inorganic compound, hormone-like substance, growth promoter, antibiotic, anthelmintic, tranquilizer, or other therapeutic or prophylactic agent;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of agriculture or the commissioner's designated representative; and

“Person” means any individual, partnership, corporation, association or other business unit.

Acts 1972, ch. 604, § 2; T.C.A., § 52-936.

53-7-303. Administration — Detention, quarantine and destruction of affected animals and animal products.

This part shall be administered by the commissioner.

Whenever any animal or animal product is found within the state to bear or contain any biological residue that has been found to be hazardous to human health, as well as any other animal or animal product that the commissioner has reason to believe contains a biological residue, it may be detained or quarantined by order of the commissioner. The animal or animal product shall remain under detention or quarantine until such time as:

The commissioner determines that the animal or animal product is within established tolerances; or

The animal or animal product is destroyed or otherwise disposed of in accordance with regulations that the commissioner shall prescribe.

Acts 1972, ch. 604, § 3; T.C.A., § 52-937.

53-7-304. Right of entry for examination purposes.

The commissioner may enter at normal business hours every place where animals or animal products are kept within the state, to examine the facilities, inventory and records pertaining to the animals or animal products, to copy all records, and to take reasonable samples of any animals or animal products, and to make additional investigations as to the source and use of substances contributing to biological residues.

Acts 1972, ch. 604, § 4; T.C.A., § 52-938.

53-7-305. Authority of commissioner to promulgate tolerance regulations.

The commissioner shall promulgate regulations setting forth tolerances for biological residues in or on animals or animal products that are consistent with tolerances adopted under authority of the Tennessee Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act, compiled in chapter 1 of this title and the Tennessee Meat and Poultry Inspection Act, compiled in part 2 of this chapter.

No tolerances may be adopted that are in excess of or that are more restrictive than those adopted by the United States department of agriculture or the federal food and drug administration for biological residues.

Acts 1972, ch. 604, § 5; T.C.A., § 52-939.

53-7-306. Violation of provisions — Penalties.

A violation of this part is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1972, ch. 604, § 6; T.C.A., § 52-940; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

53-7-307. Injunctive relief.

In addition to the remedies provided in this part, the commissioner may apply to any chancery court, and the chancery court shall have jurisdiction, for a temporary or permanent injunction restraining any person from violating this part, regardless of whether or not there exists an adequate remedy at law.

Acts 1972, ch. 604, § 7; T.C.A., § 52-941.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Chancery Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 281.